Arkansas, session 2025, HB1875.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-65-118(a)(3), concerning the Office of
Driver Services requiring the use of an ignition interlock device, is amended
to read as follows:
(3) The office shall establish:
(A) A specific calibration setting no lower than two
hundredths of one percent (0.02%) nor more than five hundredths of one
percent (0.05%) of twenty-five thousandths of one percent (0.025%) of alcohol
in the person's blood at which the ignition interlock device will prevent the
motor vehicle's being started; and
(B) The period of time that the person is subject to the
*CEB036*
04-02-2025 09:54:30 CEB036

As Engrossed: H4/2/25 HB1875
restriction.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 5-65-118(b)(1), concerning the
responsibilities of the Office of Driver Services after requiring the use of
an ignition interlock device, is amended to read as follows:
(1)(A) State on the record the requirement for and the period of
use of the ignition interlock device.
(B) However, if the office restricts the person to using
an ignition interlock device in conjunction with the issuance of an ignition
interlock restricted license under § 5-65-104, the time the person is
required to use the ignition interlock device shall be until the original
suspension imposed under § 5-65-104 has been completed except as otherwise
provided under subsection (h) of this section;

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 5-65-118(f)(2), concerning the rules of the
Department of Health for the certification of ignition interlock devices, is
amended to read as follows:
(2) The rules shall require an ignition interlock device, at a
minimum, to:
(A) Not impede the safe operation of the motor vehicle;
(B) Minimize the opportunities to be bypassed;
(C) Work accurately and reliably in an unsupervised
environment;
(D) Properly and accurately measure the person's blood
alcohol levels;
(E) Minimize the inconvenience to a sober user; and
(F) Be manufactured by an entity that is responsible for
installation, user training, and servicing and maintenance of the ignition
interlock device, and that is capable of providing monitoring reports to the
office;
(G) Be capable of randomly retesting the person's blood
alcohol level while the motor vehicle's engine or motor is on, after
providing adequate notice of the test to ensure the safe operation of the
motor vehicle;
(H) Be capable of capturing and storing the results of
each test of the person's blood alcohol level while the ignition interlock
04-02-2025 09:54:30 CEB036

As Engrossed: H4/2/25 HB1875
device is installed; and
(I) Be capable of capturing and storing a digital image of
the person at the time of each test of the person's blood alcohol level.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 5-65-118, concerning ignition interlock
devices, is amended to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(h)(1) The mandatory period for using an ignition interlock device may
be extended if, during the final sixty (60) days of the original period or
during an extension of the original period, the person:
(A)(i) Attempts to start his or her motor vehicle with a
blood alcohol level of more than twenty-five thousandths of one percent
(0.025%) as determined by the ignition interlock device.
(ii) The original period for using an ignition
interlock device shall not be extended for an attempt to start the motor
vehicle with a blood alcohol level of more than twenty-five thousandths of
one percent (0.025%) if a subsequent test performed by the person within ten
(10) minutes registers a blood alcohol level of less than twenty-five
thousandths of one percent (0.025%) and a digital image captured by the
ignition interlock device shows that the same person took the subsequent
test;
(B)(i) Fails to take a random retest of his or her blood
alcohol level while the motor vehicle's engine or motor is on.
(ii) The original period for using an ignition
interlock device shall not be extended for a failure to take a random retest
if a digital image captured by the ignition interlock device at the time of
the random retest shows that the person was not in the motor vehicle at the
time of the random retest;
(C)(i) Takes a random retest of his or her blood alcohol
level while the motor vehicle's engine or motor is on and has a blood alcohol
level of more than twenty-five thousandths of one percent (0.025%) as
determined by the ignition interlock device.
(ii) The original period for using an ignition
interlock device shall not be extended for having an alcohol concentration of
more than twenty-five thousandths of one percent (0.025%) during a random
retest of his or her blood alcohol level if a subsequent test performed by
the person within ten (10) minutes registers a blood alcohol level of less
04-02-2025 09:54:30 CEB036

As Engrossed: H4/2/25 HB1875
than twenty-five thousandths of one percent (0.025%) and a digital image
captured by the ignition interlock device shows that the same person took the
subsequent test; or
(D) Fails to have the ignition interlock device serviced
and monitored as required by subdivision (b)(6) of this section.
(2)(A) Upon completion of the period for which a person is
required to use an ignition interlock device, the person shall request that
the ignition interlock device provider certify that the person has not had a
violation under subdivision (h)(1) of this section.
(B) If the ignition interlock device provider issues a
certificate of compliance, the person may present the certificate to the
office to remove the ignition interlock restriction from the person's
driver's license.
(C)(i) If the ignition interlock device provider notifies
the person that the provider's records indicate that the person has had a
violation under subdivision (h)(1) of this section, the person may either:
(a) Accept the extension of the ignition
interlock requirement; or
(b) Request that the ignition interlock device
provider reconsider the finding of a violation, which may be based on
evidence of compliance provided by the person.
(ii) If the ignition interlock device provider
confirms the finding of a violation, the ignition interlock period will be
extended for sixty (60) days and the requirements of this section will be in
place for the additional period.
(D) If the ignition interlock device provider confirms a
finding of a violation under subdivision (h)(2)(C)(ii) of this section, the
person may demand removal of the ignition interlock device, and the provider
shall notify the office of the removal.

SECTION 5. EFFECTIVE DATE. This act is effective on July 1, 2026.

/s/Tosh



04-02-2025 09:54:30 CEB036